Massachusetts, session 194th, H5433.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. There is sound scientific evidence to conclude that nitrogen and phosphorus 
in fertilizers are contaminants that negatively affect fresh and salt waters when present in 
excessive amounts. These excessive amounts of nitrogen and phosphorus contribute to 
undesirable algae and aquatic plant growth within all Wellfleet water bodies. This undesirable 
algae and aquatic plant growth has an adverse effect on public health through the degradation of 
waters used for drinking water, shell fishing, and recreational swimming and boating. 
SECTION 2. It is necessary to prohibit the application of fertilizer that contains 
phosphorus and nitrogen so as to improve the water quality of the Town of Wellfleet. The soils 
of Wellfleet are unique insofar as Wellfleet has significant amounts of course, sandy soils that 
are subject to rapid water infiltration, percolation and leaching of nutrients, and such unique local 
conditions require that Wellfleet prohibit the application of nitrogen and phosphorus added to 
soils through the application of fertilizers. This Act should help Wellfleet to achieve compliance 

of 2 13 with the Total Maximum Daily Loads (TMDL) prescribed by the Commonwealth of 
Massachusetts for nitrogen and phosphorus in its waters. 
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any General or Special law to the contrary, including but 
not limited to any General or Special law conferring exclusive authority upon the Department of 
Agriculture to regulate and control the application of fertilizers elsewhere in the Commonwealth, 
the application of fertilizer containing nitrogen or phosphorus, or any other pollutants in the 
Town of Wellfleet is prohibited, except for the purposes of commercial agricultural and the 
residential use of organic fertilizer with low nitrogen and phosphorus for the use in growing 
fruits and vegetables.